Utah statutes.
59-2-917.   Use of funds.

The money raised by the levy imposed by Section 59-2-916 may be used for development purposes as provided in Section 59-2-916 or the governing body of any taxing entity may make contributions to the extent of the fund raised by the tax, to any state or government agency which has been organized for that public purpose and is engaged in the development.



Amended by Chapter 3, 1988 General Session

